Washington statutes.
RCW 41.07.020

Administration, maintenance, and operation of system—Intent.

The office of financial management is authorized to administer, maintain, and operate the central personnel-payroll system and to provide its services for any state agency designated by the director of financial management.

State agencies shall convert personnel and payroll processing to the central personnel-payroll system as soon as administratively and technically feasible as determined by the office of financial management and Washington technology solutions. It is the intent of the legislature to provide, through the central personnel-payroll system, for uniform reporting to the office of financial management and to the legislature regarding salaries and related costs, and to reduce present costs of manual procedures in personnel and payroll recordkeeping and reporting.

[ 2024 c 54 s 38; 2019 c 146 s 1; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 107; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 441; 1979 c 151 s 62; 1975 1st ex.s. c 239 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.